Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2151.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by <--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 adding a section to read:Section 607.1. Data Center Ordinance Assistance.--(a) No later than six months after the effective date of this subsection, the Center for Local Government Services shall develop a model zoning ordinance to assist municipalities with regulating data centers and mitigating community impacts within the boundaries of the municipalities.(b) A model ordinance under this section shall include, but is not limited to, the following provisions:(1) Dimensional standards, including height and size limits.(2) Setback distances from residential zones.(3) Landscape buffers, unless existing vegetation is proven sufficient.(4) Mechanical screening, fencing or other visual screening methods for data centers adjacent to residential areas.(5) Documentation of water and sewage system use and means of receiving electric supply service.(6) Noise and vibration limits. (7) Requirements for emergency response planning. (8) Aesthetics and parking. (c) Upon request, the Center for Local Government Services shall assist municipalities in identifying policy goals and objectives during considerations to adopt, amend or repeal zoning ordinance provisions relating to data center developments.(d) Annually on or before April 1, the Center for Local Government Services shall update and make any necessary modifications to the model ordinance under this section.(e) Upon the authorization of the Governor, the Center for Local Government Services shall have access to information, 20260HB2151PN3030 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services, functions and other resources in the possession of executive agencies under the Governor's jurisdictio n to fulfill its obligations under this section.(f) As used in this section, the term "data center" shall mean a facility or group of facilities, including its ancillary uses or associated structures located on the same tract or parcel of land, that is predominantly used to house working servers or similar data storage systems and has uninterruptible energy supply or generator backup power, or both, cooling systems, towers and other temperature control infrastructure.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.AMENDING TITLE 53 (MUNICIPALITIES GENERALLY) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, PROVIDING FOR DATA CENTER ORDINANCE ASSISTANCE.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. TITLE 53 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A CHAPTER TO READ:CHAPTER 63DATA CENTER ORDINANCE ASSISTANCESEC.6301. DEFINITIONS.6302. MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE FOR DATA CENTERS.§ 6301. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"AUTHORITY." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 5602 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS)."CENTER FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICES." THE GOVERNOR'S CENTER FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICES LOCATED WITHIN THE 20260HB2151PN3030 - 3 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 DEPARTMENT OF COMMUNITY AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT."COUNTY." A COUNTY OF THE SECOND CLASS THROUGH EIGHTH CLASS."DATA CENTER." A FACILITY OR GROUP OF FACILITIES, INCLUDING ANCILLARY USES OR ASSOCIATED STRUCTURES LOCATED ON THE SAME TRACT OR PARCEL OF LAND, THAT ARE PREDOMINANTLY USED TO HOUSE WORKING SERVERS OR SIMILAR DATA STORAGE SYSTEMS AND THAT HAVE AN UNINTERRUPTIBLE ENERGY SUPPLY OR GENERATOR BACKUP POWER, OR BOTH, COOLING SYSTEMS, TOWERS AND OTHER TEMPERATURE CONTROL INFRASTRUCTURE."DEPARTMENT." THE DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION OF THE COMMONWEALTH."MUNICIPALITY." A CITY OF THE SECOND CLASS A OR THIRD CLASS, BOROUGH, INCORPORATED TOWN, TOWNSHIP OF THE FIRST OR SECOND CLASS, COUNTY, HOME RULE MUNICIPALITY OR A SIMILAR GENERAL PURPOSE UNIT OF GOVERNMENT THAT IS CREATED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY."PUBLIC NOTICE." NOTICE OF THE PUBLICATION OF THE MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE UNDER SECTION 6302 (RELATING TO MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE FOR DATA CENTERS) AND EACH ANNUAL UPDATE UNDER SECTION 6302(E), INCLUDING THE BEGINNING AND ENDING DATE OF THE PUBLIC COMMENT PERIOD UNDER SECTION 6302(F).§ 6302. MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE FOR DATA CENTERS.(A) DEVELOPMENT AND PUBLICATION.--NO LATER THAN SIX MONTHS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE CENTER FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICES SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH A MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE TO ASSIST A MUNICIPALITY IN REGULATING A DATA CENTER AND MITIGATING COMMUNITY IMPACTS WITHIN THE BOUNDARIES OF THE MUNICIPALITY. THE MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE SHALL INCLUDE OPTIONS THAT A MUNICIPALITY MAY APPLY BY ZONING DISTRICT.(B) CONTENT.--THE MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE SHALL INCLUDE 20260HB2151PN3030 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROVISIONS RELATING TO ALL OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) DIMENSIONAL STANDARDS, INCLUDING HEIGHT AND SIZE LIMITS.(2) PLACEMENT STANDARDS FOR DATA CENTERS BY ZONING DISTRICT BASED ON COMPATIBLE USES, INCLUDING SETBACK DISTANCES FROM RESIDENTIAL ZONING DISTRICTS.(3) LANDSCAPE BUFFERS, UNLESS EXISTING VEGETATION IS SUFFICIENT.(4) MECHANICAL SCREENING, FENCING OR OTHER VISUAL SCREENING METHODS FOR DATA CENTERS ADJACENT TO RESIDENTIAL AREAS.(5) DOCUMENTATION OF WATER AND SEWAGE SYSTEM USE AND THE MEANS OF RECEIVING ELECTRIC SUPPLY SERVICE.(6) A REQUIREMENT TO CONDUCT A WATER FEASIBILITY STUDY, IF APPLICABLE, DEMONSTRATING THAT PROPOSED WATER WITHDRAWALS AND DISCHARGES WILL NOT ADVERSELY AFFECT THE QUANTITY OR QUALITY OF GROUNDWATER SUPPLIES OR SURFACE WATERS.(7) DOCUMENTATION OF PERMITS FOR A DATA CENTER'S WATER SUPPLY.(8) CERTIFICATION FROM THE APPLICABLE ELECTRIC UTILITY THAT A DATA CENTER'S ELECTRIC SERVICE WILL BE PROVIDED AND THAT THE NECESSARY ELECTRIC CAPACITY IS AVAILABLE.(9) NOISE AND VIBRATION LIMITS.(10) REQUIREMENTS FOR EMERGENCY RESPONSE PLANNING.(11) AESTHETICS AND PARKING.(C) TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE.--UPON REQUEST, THE CENTER FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICES SHALL ASSIST A MUNICIPALITY IN IDENTIFYING POLICY GOALS AND OBJECTIVES DURING CONSIDERATIONS TO ADOPT, AMEND OR REPEAL ZONING ORDINANCE PROVISIONS RELATING TO DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENTS.20260HB2151PN3030 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) STAKEHOLDER INPUT.--TO INFORM THE PRACTICABILITY OF THE MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE AND ITS IMPLEMENTATION, THE CENTER FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICES SHALL SOLICIT COMMENT AND FEEDBACK FROM THE DEPARTMENT, THE DEPARTMENT OF CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES, ENVIRONMENTAL AND NATURAL RESOURCE CONSERVATION STAKEHOLDER GROUPS AND REPRESENTATIVE ORGANIZATIONS ACTING ON BEHALF OF MUNICIPALITIES, COUNTIES OR AUTHORITIES.(E) ANNUAL UPDATE.--ANNUALLY ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1, THE CENTER FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICES SHALL UPDATE AND MAKE NECESSARY MODIFICATIONS TO THE MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE.(F) PUBLIC NOTICE AND COMMENT.--UPON PUBLICATION OF THE MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE AND UPON EACH ANNUAL UPDATE UNDER SUBSECTION (E), THE CENTER FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICES SHALL PROVIDE PUBLIC NOTICE AND HOLD A 30-DAY PUBLIC COMMENT PERIOD ON THE CONTENT OF THE MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE. DURING THE PUBLIC COMMENT PERIOD, AN INTERESTED PARTY SHALL HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD.(G) ACCESS TO EXECUTIVE AGENCY RESOURCES.--UPON AUTHORIZATION OF THE GOVERNOR, THE CENTER FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICES MAY ACCESS INFORMATION, SERVICES, FUNCTIONS AND OTHER RESOURCES IN THE POSSESSION OF EXECUTIVE AGENCIES UNDER THE GOVERNOR'S JURISDICTION TO FULFILL THE OBLIGATIONS OF THE CENTER FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT SERVICES UNDER THIS SECTION.(H) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE MUNICIPALITIES OR COUNTIES TO ADOPT THE MODEL ZONING ORDINANCE IN WHOLE OR IN PART.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20260HB2151PN3030 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627